Utah statutes.
17-50-103.   Use of "county" prohibited -- Legal action to compel compliance.

(1)  For purposes of this section:

(a) (i)  "Existing local entity" means a local district, special service district, or other political subdivision of the state created before May 1, 2000.

(ii)  "Existing local entity" does not include a county, city, town, or school district.

(b) (i) "Local district" means a local district under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts, that:

(A)  by statute is a political and corporate entity separate from the county that created it; and

(B)  by statute is not subject to the direction and control of the county that created it.

(ii)  The county legislative body's statutory authority to appoint members to the governing body of a local district does not alone make the local district subject to the direction and control of that county.

(c) (i)  "New local entity" means a city, town, school district, local district, special service district, or other political subdivision of the state created on or after May 1, 2000.

(ii)  "New local entity" does not include a county.

(2) (a)  A new local entity may not use the word "county" in its name.

(b)  After January 1, 2005, an existing local entity may not use the word "county" in its name unless the county whose name is used by the existing local entity gives its written consent.

(3)  A county with a name similar to the name of a new local entity or existing local entity in violation of this section may bring legal action in district court to compel compliance with this section.

